Massachusetts, session 194th, S2052.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of chapter 59 of the general laws, as appearing in the 2008 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following new section:-
Fifty-eighth. Upon the acceptance of this section by a city or town, the board of assessors
may grant real and personal property tax abatement up to 100 per cent of the total tax assessed to
a resident who is a licensed commercial fisherman, lobsterman, oyster farmer, or other type of
fish farmer, subject to eligibility criteria to be established by the board of assessors.
of 1